Montana, session 2025, HB437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Dismissal of CRIMINAL charges against health care provider. (1) A
health care provider, as defined in 50-16-504, may move to dismiss a CRIMINAL complaint, information, or
indictment against the provider that is based on the provider's conduct in providing health care, including but
not limited to off-label use of medications when medically appropriate and evidence based, in the ordinary
course of business or practice of the provider's profession.
(2) The court shall hold a hearing on the motion as quickly as is reasonably practicable. At the
hearing, the state shall prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the conduct on which the CRIMINAL
complaint, information, or indictment is based was:
(a) knowingly or purposely committed and not merely negligent; and
(b) outside the accepted standards of care for the health care provider.
(3) If the state does not meet its burden under subsection (2), the court shall dismiss the CRIMINAL
complaint, information, or indictment against the health care provider.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 46, chapter 13, part 4, and the provisions of Title 46, chapter 13, part 4, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 437